Hawaii statutes.
[§15D-7] Methods of applying for military-overseas ballot. (a) A covered voter
who is registered to vote in this State may apply for a military-overseas
ballot using the absentee ballot application prescribed in section 15-4, the
federal postcard application, or the application's electronic equivalent, as
appropriate.

(b) A covered voter
who is not registered to vote in this State may use a federal postcard
application or the application's electronic equivalent to apply simultaneously
to register to vote under section 15D-6 and for a military-overseas ballot.

(c) The chief
election officer shall ensure that the electronic transmission system described
in section 15D-4(b) is capable of accepting the submission of both a federal
postcard application and any other approved electronic military-overseas ballot
application sent to the appropriate election official. The voter may use the
electronic transmission system or any other approved method to apply for a
military-overseas ballot.

(d) A covered voter
may use the declaration accompanying the federal write-in absentee ballot as an
application for a military-overseas ballot simultaneously upon its submission if
it is received by the appropriate election official by the deadline prescribed
under section 15-4. [L 2012, c 226, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next